Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-121
Custer.

The county of Custer is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township thirteen, north, of range seventeen, west, of the sixth principal meridian; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty, north, of range seventeen, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty, north, of range twenty-five, west; thence south to the southwest corner of township thirteen, north, of range twenty-five, west; thence east to the place of beginning.

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 211;

R.S.1913, § 834;

C.S.1922, § 736;

C.S.1929, § 25-123;

R.S.1943, § 22-121.